Utah statutes.
76-7-326.   Partial birth abortions prohibited.

Any physician who knowingly performs a partial birth abortion and thereby kills a human fetus shall be fined or imprisoned, or both, as provided under this part.  This section does not apply to a partial birth abortion that is necessary to save the life of a mother whose life is endangered by a physical disorder, physical illness, or physical injury, including a life endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself.

